Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.525

Noncomplying name of foreign entity.

(1) A foreign entity whose name does not comply with RCW 23.95.300 for an entity of its type may not register to do business in this state until it adopts, for the purpose of doing business in this state, an alternate name that complies with RCW 23.95.300. A registered foreign entity that registers under an alternate name under this subsection need not comply with chapter 19.80 RCW. After registering to do business in this state with an alternate name, a registered foreign entity shall do business in this state under:

(a) The alternate name;

(b) Its entity name, with the addition of its jurisdiction of formation clearly identified; or

(c) An assumed or fictitious name the entity is authorized to use under chapter 19.80 RCW.

(2) If a registered foreign entity changes its name to one that does not comply with RCW 23.95.300, it may not do business in this state until it complies with subsection (1) of this section by amending its foreign registration statement to adopt an alternate name that complies with RCW 23.95.300.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1506.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.